Alaska, session 34, HB41.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 44.12 is amended by adding a new section to read: 04 Article 5. Standard Time. 05 Sec. 44.12.400. Daylight saving time. The time of the state and its political 06 subdivisions throughout the calendar year is Alaska standard time as indicated under 07 15 U.S.C. 261 and 263, advanced by one hour. 08 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 09 read: 10 DUTY OF ATTORNEY GENERAL TO NOTIFY REVISOR OF STATUTES. The 11 attorney general shall notify the revisor of statutes if federal law is amended to allow the state 12 to observe daylight saving time throughout the calendar year. 13 * Sec. 3. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 14 read: 15 CONDITIONAL EFFECT. Section 1 of this Act takes effect only if the United States 01 Congress amends federal law on or before December 31, 2031, to allow a state to observe 02 daylight saving time throughout the calendar year. 03 * Sec. 4. If sec. 1 of this Act takes effect, it takes effect on the first Sunday in November 04 following the effective date of enactment of a federal law allowing the state to observe 05 daylight saving time throughout the calendar year, unless the effective date of the federal law 06 occurs after October 1 and before the first Sunday in November, then sec. 1 of this Act takes 07 effect on the first Sunday in November of the following year. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.